Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 16 General Plant Pest Act

2-16-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known by the short title of “the Rhode Island general plant pest act”.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-1

.

2-16-2.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management for the state of Rhode Island and his or her authorized agents.

“Person” means any individual, association, partnership, society, or combination of individuals, or any institution, park, or other public agency administered by the state or by any city or town.

“Plant parts and plant products” means all vegetative and propagative structures constituting parts of the plant body or produced by plants, whether intact or subdivided, and whether or not still attached to the plant, when existing in a crude or natural
state, or which have not been processed in a manner adequate to free them of plant pests or to cause them to be incapable of harboring, vectoring, being, transmitting, or transporting those plant pests.

“Plant pest” means any insect, nematode, protozoan, crustacean, or any other invertebrate animal, and any virus, bacterium, fungus, or other member of the plant kingdom, in any stage of development, known to be or suspected of being capable of causing
serious injury or damage to, or of inciting serious diseases in, plants or parts and products of plants, whether in the field, in storage, or in markets and any animal, plant, plant part or product, or inanimate object
constituting a source of danger to plants, plant parts and products, by reason of a capacity to constitute a vector, reservoir, alternate host, place of breeding, hibernation refuge, or vehicle of distribution, for any
of the types of organisms mentioned in this subsection.

“Viruses”: All viruses shall be considered to be animate.

Terms or words as used in this chapter are construed to import either singular or plural form, and either masculine or feminine gender.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-2

.

2-16-3.
Powers of director.

The director is authorized and empowered:

To enforce all provisions of this chapter, and to have charge of all matters pertaining to official control, suppression, extermination, or exclusion of all plant pests, whether members of the plant or animal kingdom, which are, or threaten to become,
serious pests of plants of economic importance, or are in any other way inimical to the welfare of the plant industry of the state;

To enter into agreements with authorized plant pest control officials of the United States department of agriculture and of other states for the cooperative carrying out of programs consistent with the intents and purposes of this chapter;

To pronounce, declare, and publish any animal, plant, virus, bacterium, conveyance, structure, or inanimate object, singly, in groups, or as a category, to constitute a plant pest, as defined and to define any plant pest so declared to be a public nuisance
and also, to define and limit circumstances or conditions under which these definitions shall hold in any given instance;

To establish, in the manner set forth in §

2-16-10

, and to enforce, by appropriate rules and regulations, quarantines prohibiting or restricting the transportation of injurious insects and of any class of plant or plant parts, or any object or combination of objects,
capable of carrying any serious plant pest, or of itself constituting a pest, with reference to which the secretary of agriculture of the United States has not determined that a quarantine is necessary and established a quarantine,
into or through this state or any portion of this state from any other state or territory, the District of Columbia, or any part of any other state or territory, or of the District of Columbia, in which the director shall have
found the plant pest to exist;

To establish, and maintain, in the manner set forth in §

2-16-10

, a quarantine against any premises or geographical area in this state where a serious plant pest is found to occur, when a quarantine appears to be necessary and promises to be the most efficacious means for preventing
or retarding the spread of the plant pest into other premises or communities to the detriment of the welfare of the agricultural economy of the state;

To make rules and regulations for the seizure, inspection, disinfection, disinfestation, reshipment, destruction, or other disposition of any plant or plant parts or any inanimate article capable of carrying dangerous insect infestation, plant diseases,
or any other plant pest, a quarantine with respect to which has been established by the secretary of agriculture of the United States, and which has been transported to, into, or through this state in violation of that quarantine;

To make rules and orders, not contrary to law, regarding the destruction of infected or infested plants, plant parts, and plant products and to seize, treat, disinfect, disinfest, or destroy any plants, plant parts, or plant materials, or other articles
moved in violation of any quarantine, rule or regulation established under provision of this chapter or under any other act which has been or may be enacted against specific plant pests and entrusted to his or her jurisdiction,
or suspected of being infected or infested by any serious plant pest, and also, to prohibit or regulate the transportation of plants, plant parts, plant materials and inanimate articles likely to carry dangerous plant pests, and
to designate certain areas or districts where all those plants and articles may be destroyed;

To enter, in a manner not contrary to law, any public or private premises, except dwelling quarters, at reasonable hours, in the performance of his or her duty in the enforcement of this chapter; and to demand access to plant and other articles requiring
inspection;

To make requirements, not contrary to law, governing the entry from other states and territories, the District of Columbia, and any foreign country, of any plant, plant part, or other article that he or she, for purposes of plant pest control, may designate,
and to search, seize, inspect, or hold for inspection those items at the state borders, ports of entry, or point of destination; and

To revoke or suspend any certificate or license issued by his or her department, and to require the immediate surrender of certificates or licenses revoked or suspended.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-3

.

2-16-4.
Permitting plant pests to exist — Distribution of infected plants.

It is unlawful for any person in this state knowingly to permit any seriously injurious insects or plant diseases that have been or may be declared by the director to be public nuisances by reason of being plant pests, to exist on his or her premises,
unless efforts are being made to eradicate the plant pests as may exist, or to sell, offer for sale, give away, or otherwise distribute any plant infected or infested by or with the plant pests.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-4

.

2-16-5.
Concealment of plants from inspection.

No person shall cause any concealment of any plants or plant parts from inspection by the director or his or her authorized agents.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-5

.

2-16-6.
Order to destroy or treat infected plants.

If the director or his or her authorized agent finds on examination any nursery, greenhouse, field or farm crop, forest, small fruit plantation, cemetery, storehouse or elevator, conveyance, or any other private or public premises, or any plant or article
on or in the premises to be infected or infested with any seriously injurious insects or plant diseases that would be likely, in the opinion of the director, to endanger adjacent property or the welfare of the agricultural economy
of the state, the director may declare the premises, plants, or articles to be a public nuisance, and shall notify the owner or person having charge of the premises, plants, or articles to that effect, in writing, and the owner or
person in charge upon receipt of the written notification, shall within a period of time that shall be specified on the written notification by the director, cause the removal and sanitary destruction of all plants, plant products,
or articles declared if they cannot be successfully treated, otherwise the owner or person in charge shall cause them to be treated or apply any other remedial measures for the disinfestation, disinfection, control or retardment of
the pest on the premises, plant, plant products, or articles as the director may direct. Preventive measures shall be required, and shall be enforced in the same manner on any additional premises in the vicinity of the premises where
the plant pest was found as seems necessary in accordance with the judgment of the director.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-6

.

2-16-7.
Compensation for loss or destruction of infested plants.

No damages shall be awarded to the owner for the loss or destruction of infested or infected plants, plant products, or other articles or reimbursement made for expenses incurred incident to the application of the prescribed preventive or remedial measures.
The infected or infested plants, plant products, or articles are a public menace. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as preventing financial assistance to owners where that financial assistance is provided for under specific
legislation other than this chapter.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-7

.

2-16-8.
Treatment or destruction by director.

In case the owner or person in charge of the premises refuses or neglects to carry out the orders of the director within the period of time after receipt of written notification specified on the notification by the director, the director may proceed to
treat or destroy the infested or infected plants, plant products, or articles or to apply any other necessary preventive or remedial measures. The expense shall be assessed, collected, and enforced as taxes are assessed, collected,
and enforced, against the premises upon which the expense was incurred. The amount of the expense, when collected, shall be paid to the director, and by him or her deposited with the treasurer of the state.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-8

.

2-16-9.
Destruction or return of infected shipments of plants.

If any plants, or parts or products of plants being shipped to or from any point in Rhode Island, whether or not included under the term nursery stock and whether or not accompanied by a certificate of inspection or shipping permit are found to be infected
with any living dangerous insect or any contagious disease, the entire shipment is declared to be a public nuisance and is liable to destruction without compensation to the consignor, or may be reshipped to the consignor at the consignor’s
expense.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-9

.

2-16-10.
Hearing on quarantine or embargo.

Quarantines or embargoes provided for in subdivisions (4) and (5) of §

2-16-3

shall be established by the director only after a public hearing. Timely announcement of the hearing shall be given to interested persons by mail or by two (2) announcements in newspapers serving the area affected. When
in any case, in the opinion of the director, the delay necessary for the holding of the hearing is likely to cause serious harm or would in any way seriously handicap a control program, the director may establish a temporary quarantine,
effective immediately and remaining effective for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days, during which thirty (30) day period a hearing shall be announced and held as stated above, and the continuation and maintenance of this quarantine
or embargo beyond the thirty (30) day period shall be dependent on the hearing.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-10

.

2-16-11.
Penalty for violations.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or order established by the director or who interferes with the director or any of the director’s authorized agents in the performance of the agent’s duties shall, upon conviction,
be fined not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) for each offense.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-11

.

2-16-12.
Prosecution of violations.

All prosecutions of violations under the provisions of this chapter shall be instituted by the director, and shall be directed by him or her, and it is not necessary that he or she enter into recognizance or give surety for costs to prosecute these violations.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-12

.

2-16-13.
Severability.

If any section, sentence, clause, phrase, or other portion of this chapter is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, the decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3547, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

2-16-13

.